src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
Ojibwe postpositions

# Definitions for Multichar_Symbols

POS

* +Symbol = independent symbols in the text stream, like £, €, ©

Verbal MSP
* +Prs  
* +Fut  
* +Prt  
* +Prf  

* +Ind  
* +Imp   Imperative
* +Sbj   Subjunctive
* +Imm   Immediate,

* +Int   Interdiction,
* +Dur   Durative

* +1Sg     first singular
* +2Sg     etc
* +3Sg    
* +3oSg    3o is obviative,
* +3iSg    3i is indefinite

* +1Pl     1Pl is exclusive plural (I, them, not you)
* +2Pl    
* +3Pl    
* +3oPl   
* +3iPl   
* +12Pl    12Pl is inclusive plural (I, you, ...)

* +1SgO    objective conjugation
* +2SgO   
* +3SgO   
* +SgO    
* +3oSgO   obviative with objective conjugation
* +3iSgO  
* +1PlO   
* +P2lO   
* +3PlO   
* +PlO    
* +3oPlO  
* +3iPlO  

* +Inf     infinitive (infinite?)
* +Pos     postitive
* +Neg     negative
* +ConNeg  accompanying negative form

Nominal MSP
* +Sg		  singular
* +Pl		  plural

* +Px1Sg	  person prefixes for nouns
* +Px2Sg	 
* +Px3Sg	 
* +Px1Pl	  obviative
* +Px12Pl	  inclusive
* +Px2Pl	 
* +Px3Pl	 

* +IA       intransitive with animate subject,
* +II       intransitive with inanimate subject,
* +TA       transitive with animate object, and
* +TI       transitive with inanimate object.

* +AN		  animate noun
* +IN		  inanimate noun

* %> 		  suffix border

Flagdiacritics

These are documented in Chapter 8 of Beesley/Karttunen, p. 456 zB.

## Symbols that need to be escaped on the lower side (towards twolc):
* **»7**:  Literal »
* **«7**:  Literal «
```
 %[%>%]  - Literal >
 %[%<%]  - Literal <
```

 LEXICON Root 		  is where it all starts

* Noun ;	             
* Verb ;	             
* Pronoun ;            
* Punctuation ;        
* Symbols     ;        

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-ciw/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>

---
